ru: Тип контроля температуры: Фиксированная температура; Многорежимный (низкий/средний/высокий); Регулируемый (дисковый); Регулируемый (цифровой); Другое
nl: Type temperatuurregeling: Vaste temperatuur; Meerdere warmtestanden (laag/gemiddeld/hoog); Variabel (draaiknop); Variabel (digitaal); Overig
fr: Type de régulation de la température: Température fixe; Chaleur multiple (basse/moyenne/élevée); Variable (cadran); Variable (numérique); Autre
bg-BG: Тип контрол на температурата: Фиксирана температура; Многостепенно нагряване (ниско/средно/високо); Регулируема (с копче); Регулируема (цифрова); Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de controlo de temperatura: Temperatura fixa; Calor múltiplo (baixo/médio/alto); Variável (botão rotativo); Variável (digital); Outro
nb: Type temperaturkontroll: Fast temperatur; Flere varmeinnstillinger (lav/middels/høy); Variabel (hjul); Variabel (digital); Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de controle de temperatura: Temperatura fixa; Multiaquecimento (baixo/médio/alto); Variável (botão giratório); Variável (digital); Outro
fi: Lämpötilan säädön tyyppi: Kiinteä lämpötila; Monitasoinen (matala/keskitaso/korkea); Säädettävä (valitsin); Säädettävä (digitaalinen); Muu
it: Tipo di controllo della temperatura: Temperatura fissa; Multicalore (basso/medio/alto); Variabile (manopola); Variabile (digitale); Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta kontrole temperature: Fiksna temperatura; Višestruko grijanje (nisko/srednje/visoko); Podesivo (kotačić); Podesivo (digitalno); Ostalo
ko: 온도 제어 유형: 고정 온도; 다중 온도(저/중/고); 가변(다이얼); 가변(디지털); 기타
tr: Sıcaklık kontrol tipi: Sabit sıcaklık; Çoklu ısı (düşük/orta/yüksek); Değişken (kadran); Değişken (dijital); Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta nadzora temperature: Fiksna temperatura; Večstopenjsko ogrevanje (nizko/srednje/visoko); Spremenljivo (številčnica); Spremenljivo (digitalno); Drugo
vi: Loại kiểm soát nhiệt độ: Nhiệt độ cố định; Đa nhiệt độ (thấp/trung bình/cao); Điều chỉnh được (nút xoay); Điều chỉnh được (kỹ thuật số); Khác
en: Temperature control type: Fixed temperature; Multi-heat (low/medium/high); Variable (dial); Variable (digital); Other
es: Tipo de control de temperatura: Temperatura fija; Calor múltiple (bajo/medio/alto); Variable (selector); Variable (digital); Otro
sv: Typ av temperaturkontroll: Fast temperatur; Flerstegsvärme (låg/medel/hög); Variabel (ratt); Variabel (digital); Annat
zh-TW: 溫度控制類型: 固定溫度; 多段加熱 (低/中/高); 可變 (旋鈕); 可變 (數位); 其他
lt-LT: Temperatūros reguliavimo tipas: Fiksuota temperatūra; Kelių lygių kaitinimas (žemas / vidutinis / aukštas); Reguliuojama (ratuku); Reguliuojama (skaitmeninė); Kita
de: Art der Temperatursteuerung: Feste Temperatur; Mehrere Stufen (niedrig/mittel/hoch); Variabel (Drehregler); Variabel (digital); Sonstige
el: Τύπος ελέγχου θερμοκρασίας: Σταθερή θερμοκρασία; Πολλαπλή θερμότητα (χαμηλή/μεσαία/υψηλή); Μεταβλητή (επιλογέας); Μεταβλητή (ψηφιακή); Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ ovládača teploty: Fixná teplota; Viacúrovňový ohrev (nízky/stredný/vysoký); Variabilné (koliesko); Variabilné (digitálne); Iné
th: ประเภทการควบคุมอุณหภูมิ: อุณหภูมิคงที่; หลายระดับ (ต่ำ/กลาง/สูง); ปรับได้ (หน้าปัด); ปรับได้ (ดิจิทัล); อื่นๆ
ja: 温度制御タイプ: 温度固定式; マルチヒート (低/中/高); 可変 (ダイヤル式); 可変 (デジタル式); その他
ro-RO: Tip de control al temperaturii: Temperatură fixă; Căldură multiplă (scăzut/mediu/ridicat); Variabil (cadran); Variabil (digital); Altele
da: Temperaturstyringstype: Fast temperatur; Flere varmeindstillinger (lav/mellem/høj); Variabel (drejeknap); Variabel (digital); Andet
zh-CN: 温度控制类型: 固定温度; 多档加热（低/中/高）; 无级可调（旋钮）; 无级可调（数字）; 其他
cs: Typ regulace teploty: Pevná teplota; Více stupňů (nízký / střední / vysoký); Variabilní (kolečko); Variabilní (digitální); Jiné
pl: Typ sterowania temperaturą: Stała temperatura; Wielopoziomowa (niska/średnia/wysoka); Zmienna (pokrętło); Zmienna (cyfrowa); Inny
hu: Hőmérséklet-szabályozás típusa: Fix hőmérséklet; Többfokozatú (alacsony/közepes/magas); Állítható (tárcsás); Állítható (digitális); Egyéb